dev/bm.adj.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary: bokmål adjectives with pardefs, to be added
	Sections: 1
	Entries: 26618
	Sdefs: 54
	Paradigms: 277
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools format -alignMonodix bm.adj.xml bm2.adj.xml

FIXED: many of the paradigms had "ind" where we should have "def", eg:
<e> <p><l>gode</l> <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
should be
<e> <p><l>gode</l> <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

TODO on moving paradigms from this file into nb.dix:
- verbal adjectives (those with at least one pprs entry) should have "pp",
  not "posi" on the other entries. HOWEVER: some of these are collapsed with
  non-verbal adjectives in this file (more or less those with at least one pprs
  entry and at least one comp/sup entry -- pure verbal adjectives have no
  comp/sup forms). So be careful on copying in paradigms... Use eg.
  https://savannah.nongnu.org/projects/ordbanken/ to check these
  (<perf-part> => "pp", pos => "posi", <pres-part> => "pprs").

-->
<dictionary>
	<alphabet>ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZÆØÅabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzæøåcqwxzCQWXZéèêóòâôÉÊÈÓÔÒÂ</alphabet>
	<sdefs>
		<sdef n="n" 	c="Noun"/> 
		<sdef n="np" 	c="Proper noun"/> 
		<sdef n="top" 	c="Toponym"/> 
		<sdef n="prn" 	c="Pronoun"/> 
		<sdef n="ref" 	c="Reflexive pronoun"/> 
		<sdef n="res" 	c="Resiprocal pronoun"/> 
		<sdef n="det" 	c="Determiner"/> 
		<sdef n="pos" 	c="Possessive"/> 
		<sdef n="p1" 	c="1st person"/> 
		<sdef n="p2" 	c="2nd person"/> 
		<sdef n="p3" 	c="3rd person"/> 
		<sdef n="nt" 	c="Neuter"/> 
		<sdef n="mf" 	c="Masculine / feminine"/> 
		<sdef n="f" 	c="Feminine"/> 
		<sdef n="m" 	c="Masculine"/> 
		<sdef n="sp" 	c="Singular / plural"/> 
		<sdef n="sg" 	c="Singular"/> 
		<sdef n="pl" 	c="Plural"/> 
		<sdef n="ind" 	c="Indefinite"/> 
		<sdef n="def" 	c="Definite"/> 
		<sdef n="nom" 	c="Nominative"/> 
		<sdef n="acc" 	c="Accusative"/> 
		<sdef n="gen" 	c="Genitive"/> 
		<sdef n="dem" 	c="Demonstrative"/> 
		<sdef n="itg" 	c="Question word / interrogative"/> 
		<sdef n="qnt" 	c="Quantifier"/> 
		<sdef n="emph" 	c="Emphatic"/> 
		<sdef n="vblex" 	c="Verb"/> 
		<sdef n="pst" 	c="-st form"/> 
		<sdef n="pstv" 	c="-st verb"/> 
		<sdef n="inf" 	c="Infinitive"/> 
		<sdef n="pres" 	c="Present"/> 
		<sdef n="imp" 	c="Imperative"/> 
		<sdef n="pret" 	c="Preterite"/> 
		<sdef n="pp" 	c="Perfect participle"/> 
		<sdef n="pprs" 	c="Present participle (adjectival)"/> 
		<sdef n="pr" 	c="Preposition"/> 
		<sdef n="adv" 	c="Adverb"/> 
		<sdef n="adj" 	c="Adjective"/> 
		<sdef n="part" 	c="Participle (infinitive)"/> 
		<sdef n="cnjsub" 	c="Subordinating conjunction"/> 
		<sdef n="cnjcoo" 	c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/> 
		<sdef n="cnjadv" 	c="Adverbial conjunction"/> 
 		<sdef n="posi" 	c="Positive"/> 
		<sdef n="comp" 	c="Comparative"/> 
		<sdef n="sup" 	c="Superlative"/> 
		<sdef n="num" 	c="Numeral"/> 
		<sdef n="ord" 	c="Ordinal"/> 
		<sdef n="acr" 	c="Acronym"/> 
		<sdef n="sent" 	c="Sentence end"/> 
		<sdef n="cm" 	c="Comma"/> 
		<sdef n="clb" 	c="Possible clause boundary"/> 
		<sdef n="lpar" 	c="Left parenthesis"/> 
		<sdef n="rpar" 	c="Right parenthesis"/> 
	</sdefs>
	<pardefs>
<pardef n="nug/ge__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>ge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>ge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>ge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>ge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ga</l>        <r>ge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ga</l>        <r>ge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ga</l>        <r>ge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ga</l>        <r>ge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gede</l>      <r>ge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gede</l>      <r>ge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gende</l>     <r>ge<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gete</l>      <r>ge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gete</l>      <r>ge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>get</l>       <r>ge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>get</l>       <r>ge<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="emerit/us__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="t/ie__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>agde</l>      <r>ie<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agde</l>      <r>ie<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agd</l>       <r>ie<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agd</l>       <r>ie<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idde</l>      <r>ie<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idde</l>      <r>ie<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idd</l>       <r>ie<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idd</l>       <r>ie<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iende</l>     <r>ie<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="dr/ikke__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ikkende</l>   <r>ikke<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ukken</l>     <r>ikke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ukket</l>     <r>ikke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ukket</l>     <r>ikke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ukne</l>      <r>ikke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ukne</l>      <r>ikke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bruk/ket__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ket</l>       <r>ket<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ket</l>       <r>ket<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>ket<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nere</l>      <r>ket<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>ket<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>neste</l>     <r>ket<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nest</l>      <r>ket<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="brukket">         <i>bruk</i><par n="bruk/ket__adj"/></e>
<e lm="forstikke">       <i>forst</i><par n="dr/ikke__adj"/></e>
<e lm="emeritus">        <i>emerit</i><par n="emerit/us__adj"/></e>
<e lm="avstikke">        <i>avst</i><par n="dr/ikke__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bestikke">        <i>best</i><par n="dr/ikke__adj"/></e>
<e lm="drikke">          <i>dr</i><par n="dr/ikke__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hygge">           <i>hyg</i><par n="nug/ge__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fløyelstrukket">  <i>fløyelstruk</i><par n="bruk/ket__adj"/></e>
<e lm="heiltrukket">     <i>heiltruk</i><par n="bruk/ket__adj"/></e>
<e lm="antrukket">       <i>antruk</i><par n="bruk/ket__adj"/></e>
<e lm="brygge">          <i>bryg</i><par n="nug/ge__adj"/></e>
<e lm="heltrukket">      <i>heltruk</i><par n="bruk/ket__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vasstrukket">     <i>vasstruk</i><par n="bruk/ket__adj"/></e>
<e lm="utstukket">       <i>utstuk</i><par n="bruk/ket__adj"/></e>
<e lm="uttrukket">       <i>uttruk</i><par n="bruk/ket__adj"/></e>
<e lm="smugdrikke">      <i>smugdr</i><par n="dr/ikke__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sidrikke">        <i>sidr</i><par n="dr/ikke__adj"/></e>
<e lm="trygge">          <i>tryg</i><par n="nug/ge__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tilbaketrukket">  <i>tilbaketruk</i><par n="bruk/ket__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tie">             <i>t</i><par n="t/ie__adj"/></e>
<e lm="utstikke">        <i>utst</i><par n="dr/ikke__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tigge">           <i>tig</i><par n="nug/ge__adj"/></e>
<e lm="skygge">          <i>skyg</i><par n="nug/ge__adj"/></e>
<e lm="stikke">          <i>st</i><par n="dr/ikke__adj"/></e>
<e lm="oppdrukket">      <i>oppdruk</i><par n="bruk/ket__adj"/></e>
<e lm="knegge">          <i>kneg</i><par n="nug/ge__adj"/></e>
<e lm="opptrukket">      <i>opptruk</i><par n="bruk/ket__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nytrukket">       <i>nytruk</i><par n="bruk/ket__adj"/></e>
<e lm="overskygge">      <i>overskyg</i><par n="nug/ge__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kappdrikke">      <i>kappdr</i><par n="dr/ikke__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nugge">           <i>nug</i><par n="nug/ge__adj"/></e>
<e lm="knivstikke">      <i>knivst</i><par n="dr/ikke__adj"/></e>
<e lm="innstukket">      <i>innstuk</i><par n="bruk/ket__adj"/></e>
<e lm="oppstukket">      <i>oppstuk</i><par n="bruk/ket__adj"/></e>
